Utah statutes.
75-2a-116.   Presumption of validity of directive.

(1)  A health care directive executed under this chapter is presumed valid and binding.

(2)  Health care providers and health care facilities, in the absence of notice to the contrary, shall presume that a declarant who executed a health care directive, whether or not in the presence of a health care provider, had the required decision making capacity at the time the declarant signed the directive.  The fact a declarant executed a health care directive shall not be construed as an indication that the declarant was suffering from mental illness or lacked decision making capacity.



Enacted by Chapter 31, 2007 General Session

